fr: Type de rembourrage pour short de protection: Rembourrage à air/gonflable; Mousse à cellules fermées; D3O ou matériau non newtonien similaire; Mousse d’éthylène-acétate de vinyle; Gel; Inserts à coque rigide (plastique); Mousse à mémoire de forme; Mousse à cellules ouvertes; Coussinets amovibles; Mousse viscoélastique/réactive aux chocs; Autre
zh-TW: 防摔褲墊類型: 充氣襯墊; 閉孔泡棉; D3O 或類似非牛頓材料; EVA 泡棉; 凝膠; 硬殼 (塑膠) 墊片; 記憶泡棉; 開孔泡棉; 可拆卸護墊; 黏彈性/衝擊反應泡棉; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de acolchoamento dos calções de proteção: Almofadado a ar/insuflável; Espuma de células fechadas; D3O ou material não newtoniano semelhante; Espuma de etileno acetato de vinilo; Gel; Inserções de revestimento rígido (plástico); Espuma de memória; Espuma de células abertas; Almofadas amovíveis; Espuma viscoelástica/reativa a impactos; Outro
sk-SK: Typ polstrovania ochranných šortiek: Vzduchová/nafukovacia výplň; Pena s uzavretými bunkami; D3O alebo podobný nenewtonovský materiál; Pena EVA; Gél; Vložky z tvrdého plastu; Pamäťová pena; Pena s otvorenými bunkami; Odnímateľné chrániče; Viskoelastická/nárazovo reaktívna pena; Iné
zh-CN: 防护短裤衬垫类型: 空气/充气填充; 闭孔泡沫; D3O 或类似非牛顿流体材料; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯泡沫; 凝胶; 硬壳（塑料）插件; 记忆棉; 开孔泡沫; 可拆卸护垫; 粘弹性/抗冲击反应泡沫; 其他
nl: Type vulling beschermende shorts: Lucht/opblaasbare voering; Geslotencelschuim; D3O of vergelijkbaar niet-Newtoniaans materiaal; Ethyleen-vinylacetaatschuim; Gel; Hardshell (plastic) inzetstukken; Traagschuim; Opencelschuim; Uitneembare pads; Visco-elastisch/impact-reactief schuim; Overig
de: Polsterungsart der Protektorenshort: Luft-/aufblasbare Polsterung; Geschlossenzelliger Schaumstoff; D3O oder ähnliches nichtnewtonsches Material; EVA-Schaum; Gel; Hartschalen-Einsätze (Kunststoff); Memory-Schaum; Offenzelliger Schaumstoff; Herausnehmbare Polster; Viskoelastischer/aufprallreaktiver Schaumstoff; Sonstige
cs: Typ vycpávek ochranných šortek: Vzduchové/nafukovací polstrování; Pěna s uzavřenými póry; D3O nebo podobný nenewtonský materiál; Ethylen vinylacetát pěnový; Gel; Tvrdé (plastové) vložky; Paměťová pěna; Pěna s otevřenými póry; Odnímatelné vycpávky; Viskoelastická pěna / pěna reagující na náraz; Jiné
pt-BR: Short de proteção, tipo de acolchoamento: Preenchimento a ar/inflável; Espuma de célula fechada; D3O ou material não newtoniano semelhante; Espuma EVA; Gel; Inserções rígidas (plástico); Espuma viscoelástica; Espuma de célula aberta; Protetores removíveis; Espuma viscoelástica/reativa ao impacto; Outro
vi: Loại đệm của quần short bảo hộ: Đệm khí/bơm hơi; Bọt xốp ô kín; D3O hoặc vật liệu phi Newton tương tự; Bọt EVA; Gel; Miếng chèn vỏ cứng (nhựa); Mút hoạt tính; Bọt xốp ô mở; Đệm có thể tháo rời; Bọt xốp đàn hồi nhớt/phản ứng va đập; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de căptușeală pentru șorțuri de protecție: Căptușeală cu aer/gonflabilă; Spumă cu celule închise; D3O sau material non-newtonian similar; Spumă EVA; Gel; Inserții din carcasă dură (plastic); Spumă cu memorie; Spumă cu celule deschise; Tampoane detașabile; Spumă vâscoelastică/reactivă la impact; Altele
it: Tipo di imbottitura dei pantaloncini protettivi: Imbottitura ad aria/gonfiabile; Schiuma a cellule chiuse; D3O o materiale non newtoniano simile; Schiuma di etilene acetato di vinile; Gel; Inserti rigidi (in plastica); Memory foam; Schiuma a cellule aperte; Cuscinetti rimovibili; Schiuma viscoelastica/reattiva agli urti; Altro
da: Polstringstype for beskyttelsesshorts: Luft-/oppustelig polstring; Skum med lukkede celler; D3O eller lignende ikke-newtonsk materiale; EVA-skum; Gel; Hård skal (plastikindlæg); Memoryskum; Skum med åbne celler; Aftagelige puder; Viskoelastisk/stødabsorberende skum; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta podstava zaštitnih hlačica: Podstava sa zrakom / na napuhavanje; Pjena zatvorenih ćelija; D3O ili sličan nenjutnovski materijal; EVA pjena; Gel; Tvrdi (plastični) umeci; Memorijska pjena; Pjena otvorenih ćelija; Odvojivi jastučići; Viskoelastična / na udarce reaktivna pjena; Ostalo
sv: Typ av vaddering för skyddsshorts: Luft/uppblåsbar vaddering; Skum med slutna celler; D3O eller liknande icke-newtonskt material; EVA-skum; Gel; Inlägg med hårt skal (plast); Memoryskum; Skum med öppna celler; Löstagbara inlägg; Viskoelastiskt/stötabsorberande skum; Övrigt
ru: Тип защиты шортов: Воздушный/надувной наполнитель; Пеноматериал с закрытыми ячейками; D3O или аналогичный неньютоновский материал; Пеноматериал EVA; Гель; Жесткие (пластиковые) вставки; Пена с эффектом памяти; Пеноматериал с открытыми ячейками; Съемные вставки; Вязкоэластичная/реактивная пена; Другое
lt-LT: Apsauginių šortų paminkštinimo tipas: Pripučiamas paminkštinimas; Uždarų porų putplastis; D3O arba panaši nenutoninė medžiaga; EVA putplastis; Gelis; Kieto korpuso (plastiko) įdėklai; Viskoelastinis putplastis; Atvirų porų putplastis; Išimamos apsaugos; Viskoelastinis / į smūgius reaguojantis putplastis; Kita
bg-BG: Тип подплънка на защитни шорти: Въздушна/надуваема подплата; Пяна със затворени клетки; D3O или подобен ненютонов материал; EVA пяна; Гел; Твърди (пластмасови) вложки; Мемори пяна; Пяна с отворени клетки; Свалящи се подложки; Вискоеластична/реактивна при удар пяна; Друго
ko: 보호용 쇼츠 패딩 유형: 공기/공기 주입식 패딩; 폐쇄형 셀 폼; D3O 또는 유사 비뉴턴 물질; EVA 폼; 겔; 하드 쉘(플라스틱) 인서트; 메모리 폼; 개방형 셀 폼; 탈부착식 패드; 점탄성/충격 반응형 폼; 기타
nb: Polstringstype i beskyttelsesshorts: Luft / oppblåsbar polstring; Skum med lukkede celler; D3O eller lignende ikke-newtonsk materiale; Etylen-vinylacetatskum; Gel; Harde skallinnlegg (plast); Minneskum; Skum med åpne celler; Avtakbare puter; Viskoelastisk / støtreaktivt skum; Annet
tr: Koruyucu şort dolgu tipi: Hava/Şişirilebilir dolgu; Kapalı hücreli köpük; D3O veya benzeri Newton tipi olmayan malzeme; EVA köpük; Jel; Sert yüzeyli (plastik) parçalar; Hafızalı sünger; Açık hücreli köpük; Çıkarılabilir pedler; Viskoelastik/Darbeye tepki veren köpük; Diğer
ja: プロテクトショーツパディングタイプ: エア/インフレータブルパッド; 独立気泡フォーム; D3O または類似の非ニュートン素材; エチレン酢酸ビニルアセテートフォーム; ゲル; ハードシェル (プラスチック) インサート; メモリーフォーム; 連続気泡フォーム; 取り外し可能なパッド; 粘弾性/衝撃反応フォーム; その他
hu: Védősort párnázási típusa: Levegős/felfújható betét; Zártcellás hab; D3O vagy hasonló nem newtoni anyag; EVA-hab; Zselé; Kemény héjas (műanyag) betétek; Memóriahab; Nyitottcellás hab; Kivehető betétek; Viszkoelasztikus/ütődésre reagáló hab; Egyéb
en: Protective shorts padding type: Air/Inflatable padding; Closed-cell foam; D3O or similar non-Newtonian material; EVA foam; Gel; Hard shell (plastic) inserts; Memory foam; Open-cell foam; Removable pads; Viscoelastic/Impact-reactive foam; Other
fi: Suojaavan shortsien pehmusteen tyyppi: Ilma/täytettävä pehmuste; Umpisoluinen vaahtomuovi; D3O tai vastaava ei-newtonilainen materiaali; EVA-vaahto; Geeli; Kovat (muoviset) suojat; Muistivaahto; Avosoluinen vaahtomuovi; Irrotettavat pehmusteet; Viskoelastinen / iskuun reagoiva vaahto; Muu
es: Material de relleno de los pantalones cortos de protección: Acolchado de aire/inflable; Espuma de celda cerrada; D3O o material no newtoniano similar; Espuma de etilvinilacetato; Gel; Insertos de cubierta dura (plástico); Espuma viscoelástica; Espuma de celda abierta; Almohadillas extraíbles; Espuma viscoelástica/reactiva al impacto; Otro
th: ประเภทแผ่นรองในกางเกงซับในกันกระแทก: แผ่นบุแบบเป่าลม; โฟมเซลล์ปิด; D3O หรือวัสดุ Non-Newtonian ที่ใกล้เคียง; โฟมอีทิลีนไวนิลอะเซเทต; เจล; แผ่นพลาสติกแข็งเสริม; เมมโมรี่โฟม; โฟมเซลล์เปิด; แผ่นบุถอดออกได้; โฟมวิสโคอีลาสติก/โฟมตอบสนองต่อแรงกระแทก; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta blazinjenja zaščitnih kratkih hlač: Zračno/napihljivo oblazinjenje; Pena z zaprtimi celicami; D3O ali podoben nenewtonski material; Pena EVA; Gel; Trdi plastični vstavki; Spominska pena; Pena z odprtimi celicami; Odstranljivi vložki; Viskoelastična/reaktivna pena; Drugo
el: Τύπος ενίσχυσης προστατευτικού σορτς: Επένδυση αέρα/φουσκωτή; Αφρός κλειστής κυψέλης; D3O ή παρόμοιο μη νευτώνειο υλικό; Αφρός EVA; Τζελ; Ένθετα σκληρού περιβλήματος (πλαστικά); Αφρός μνήμης; Αφρός ανοιχτής κυψέλης; Αφαιρούμενα προστατευτικά; Ιξωδοελαστικός/αντιδραστικός σε κρούση αφρός; Άλλο
pl: Typ wypełnienia spodenek ochronnych: Wypełnienie powietrzne / nadmuchiwane; Pianka zamkniętokomórkowa; D3O lub podobny materiał nienewtonowski; Pianka EVA; Żel; Sztywne wkładki (plastikowe); Pianka termoelastyczna; Pianka otwartokomórkowa; Wyjmowane wkładki; Pianka wiskoelastyczna / reagująca na uderzenia; Inne